Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-115
Certified public accountant; examinations, when held; use of prepared questions and grading service.

The examinations described in section 1-114 shall be held by the board and shall take place as often as the board determines to be desirable, but such examinations shall be held not less frequently than once each year. The board may make such use of all or any part of the Uniform Certified Public Accountants' Examination or Advisory Grading Service, or either of them, as it deems appropriate to assist it in performing its duties.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 10, p. 59;

Laws 1976, LB 619, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 473, § 5;

Laws 1991, LB 75, § 4.